Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2306
Damage, defined.

Damage shall mean any impact with, partial or complete severance, destruction, impairment, or penetration of, or removal or weakening of support from an underground facility, including its protective coating, housing, or other protective device.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 6.